Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

State Aid

43-21-101. Disbursement of state aid grants by commissioner.

All grants of state aid to agricultural fairs by appropriation of the general assembly shall be disbursed by the commissioner of agriculture according to this chapter.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.33 (Williams, § 552.56); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2401.

Cross-References. Exemption from business tax, § 67-4-712.

Mass gatherings, title 68, ch. 112.

Powers and duties of department of agriculture, § 4-3-203.

Premiums at fairs, § 39-17-508.

Race meeting fairs, § 36-311.

State and county fairs, § 5-9-102.

Comparative Legislation. Fairs:

Ala. Code § 2-7-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 2-36-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 2-2-8 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 247.090 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 69-5-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 262.470 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-502 et seq.

Collateral References. Agriculture
3.

43-21-102. Fairs eligible for state aid grants — Use of funds — Forfeiture of privilege.

The commissioner of agriculture, for the purpose of fostering and developing agriculture within the state of Tennessee, is authorized to pay state aid from the grants made by the general assembly for such purposes to nonprofit agricultural shows held for the purpose of advancing agriculture. Fairs that receive state aid shall use their profits for future fair improvements, increasing their premium lists, and furthering the growth, expansion, and usefulness of fairs in every way possible, and to provide for a possible deficit at some future fair. Whenever a fair converts its profits into the treasury of a county, or pays dividends to stockholders, it forfeits its privilege of sharing in state aid.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.34 (Williams, § 552.57); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2402.

43-21-103. Amount each fair to receive — Limitation on amount.

The amount of state aid given a community, county, district, division or other agricultural show shall be a percentage of the premiums paid by the show, except for special merit, as is provided in this section:

No community fair shall be paid more than fifty percent (50%) of its approved agricultural premiums in any one (1) year;

No county fair shall be paid more than fifty percent (50%) of its approved agricultural premiums in any one (1) year;

No district fair shall be paid more than fifty percent (50%) of its approved agricultural premiums in any one (1) year; and

No division fair shall be paid more than fifty percent (50%) of its approved agricultural premiums in any one (1) year.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.35 (Williams, § 552.58); Acts 1957, ch. 261, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2403; Acts 1980, ch. 670, §§ 1-4.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

43-21-104. Chapter definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Community fair” means a fair serving an area of less than an entire county, at which are exhibited, in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner of agriculture, with cash premiums being paid to the exhibitors thereof, agricultural products produced in the area served;

“County fair” means a fair serving an entire county;

“District fair” means a fair serving at least five (5) counties but less than an entire grand division of the state and paying not less than a minimum of seven thousand dollars ($7,000) in cash premiums; and

“Division fair” means a fair serving a major region of the state and paying more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in premiums.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.35 (Williams, § 552.58); Acts 1957, ch. 261, § 2; 1976, ch. 633, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2404.

Compiler's Notes. Title 48, ch. 1, part 11, referred to in this section, was repealed, effective January 1, 1988, by Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 17.05 and Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 18.05.

Cross-References. Grand division, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

43-21-105. Aid not to exceed appropriation.

The total of state aid to be paid by the commissioner of agriculture to eligible fairs shall not exceed the appropriation made to aid agricultural fairs by the general assembly.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.36 (Williams, § 552.59); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2405.

43-21-106. Premiums for enumerated exhibits may share in state aid.

The commissioner of agriculture shall grant such state aid only on cash premiums paid on approved classes of:

Cattle, swine, sheep, goats, farmwork stock, including mules shown to halter or farm vehicles, jack stock and light horses to halter;

Poultry, eggs, and dairy products;

Field, garden and horticultural products;

Home economics displays;

Junior agricultural projects; and

Agricultural educational exhibits.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.37 (Williams, § 552.60); Acts 1957, ch. 261, § 3; 1963, ch. 135, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2406.

Cross-References. Lawful to contest for premiums at fairs, § 39-17-508.

43-21-107. Statement of premiums to be awarded — Allotment on basis of statement — When funds paid.

On a date to be specified by the commissioner of agriculture, the president and secretary of any fair, or agricultural society wishing to share in state aid to fairs as provided for under § 43-21-102, shall file with the commissioner a sworn statement of premiums to be paid during the current fair season for entries outlined in § 43-21-106. In addition thereto and together with sworn statement, the president and secretary shall also show correctly the exact amount paid in premiums for the same entries in the preceding fair season. State aid on the basis of premiums paid during the preceding fair season will be allocated by the commissioner for the current fair season. Whenever any fair did not operate during the preceding fair season, the commissioner is authorized in that instance alone to make an allocation of state aid based upon the estimate of premiums to be paid during the current fair season.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.38 (Williams, § 552.61); Acts 1955, ch. 310, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2407.

43-21-108. List of premium winners and receipts to be furnished commissioner before payment.

Before the commissioner of agriculture pays state aid to any fair association, the association shall file with the commissioner, over the signature of the secretary, a typewritten report of approved premiums paid by the association, namely, those outlined in § 43-21-106. This report shall show the name and address of each premium winner, the amount paid to each winner, the name of each winning entry, and the total amount paid to all winners. The secretary of the fair shall send to the commissioner, together with the report outlined above, the cancelled checks, or signed receipts, used in paying the premiums listed on the report. The commissioner may accept a certified summary of premiums paid by a fair association who has paid approved agriculture premiums in excess of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000); provided, that any fair may submit a statement prepared and certified by an accountant instead of the certified summary.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.39 (Williams, § 552.62); Acts 1974, ch. 430, § 1; 1978, ch. 596, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2408.

43-21-109. Determination of compliance — Issuance of voucher upon compliance.

The commissioner of agriculture shall determine from the evidence outlined above, namely, reports and checks or receipts, and by any inquiries that shall be considered necessary by the commissioner, whether or not the fair has been held in accordance with all the foregoing provisions of this chapter.

If, in the commissioner's judgment, the fair has complied with all the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner shall issue a state voucher according to the regular accounting procedures in effect in the department of agriculture and shall pass such voucher on to the department of finance and administration for approval; but the commissioner shall refuse to pay state aid to any fair that has not been held in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.40 (Williams, § 552.63); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2409.

43-21-110. Commissioner authorized to make regulations.

The commissioner of agriculture is empowered to make such rules and regulations in conformity with this chapter as, in the commissioner's judgment, may promote better agricultural fairs and agriculture in general in Tennessee.

Acts 1949, ch. 156, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.41 (Williams, § 552.64); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2410.

43-21-111. Appropriation for state aid — Special awards for merit.

There is appropriated from the general funds of the state the sum of one hundred sixty thousand dollars ($160,000) annually to be disbursed for state aid to agricultural fairs in accordance with this chapter.

The commissioner is authorized to expend a maximum of ten percent (10%) of this annual appropriation for administration of the laws contained in this chapter, including, but not limited to, education of persons conducting fairs in the state in agricultural fair administration and the salary of a full-time employee, whose duty shall be to promote and improve the operation of fairs in this state as directed by the commissioner. The employment of such person is authorized by this subsection (b).

In addition, the commissioner is authorized, in the commissioner's discretion, to grant state aid to fairs that are not under this chapter entitled to state aid and to beginning fairs needing financial assistance, but these discretionary grants shall not exceed an aggregate sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually.

The annual appropriation after the deduction of sums used as authorized in subsections (b) and (c) for administration hereof and for discretionary aid to fairs not otherwise entitled to aid shall be divided into two (2) funds, one (1) of which shall be two thirds (2/3) of the remaining total, all of which shall be used for the award of state aid to fairs provided for in § 43-21-103 et seq., and a second fund consisting of one third (1/3) of the remaining total, which shall be disbursed as provided in subsection (e) to those fairs that attain special excellence in operations.

For the purpose of determining state champion county fairs, the total sum of eligible county fairs shall be divided into three (3) classifications based upon the population of the county served by a fair as reported in the most current available census. In descending order of population, the top one third (1/3) shall be classified as triple “A” (AAA) fairs, the middle one third (1/3) as double “A” (AA) fairs, and the bottom one third (1/3) as single “A” (A) fairs. There shall be a state championship award to the champion county fair each year in each of the three (3) classifications; and there shall also be designated a first runner-up and a second runner-up each year in each classification. There shall be awarded to each fair determined worthy thereof an award to be known as the special award of merit. No fair shall be eligible for more than one (1) of the four (4) designations in each classification. The commissioner is authorized to designate as deputies or agents for the purpose of determining those fairs that are entitled to the special awards such citizens of the state as the commissioner may deem capable of this determination, including, but not limited to, the persons who shall constitute the officers and directors of any state association of fairs that may be in existence; and is authorized to adopt reasonable rules, regulations and standards to be followed in the selection of those fairs worthy of the awards.

The best county fair in each classification shall be entitled to receive out of the special awards fund a special merit award equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the state aid paid to it under § 43-21-103.

Each of the remaining eligible fairs shall share in the balance of the special awards fund in an amount equally proportionate to the state aid paid to each individual fair under § 43-21-103.

Community fairs shall not participate in the fund provided for in this section for disbursement to fairs that attain special excellence.

If any sum remains unused out of the fund provided for distribution under § 43-21-103, that sum shall be added to the special merit award fund and distributed to the fairs entitled to special merit awards.

The commissioner is empowered to reduce merit awards not to exceed twenty percent (20%) in case proper records and reports are not filed as required under the merit awards program.

Acts 1957, ch. 261, § 4; 1963, ch. 135, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-2411; Acts 1980, ch. 670, § 5; 1991, ch. 150, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

43-21-112. Limitation on amount of state aid.

No fair shall receive state aid in excess of fifty percent (50%) of its approved agricultural premiums in any one (1) year under this chapter. In no case shall a fair association in any one (1) season be paid in both state aid and merit award combined more than one half (½) the amount paid by the association in approved agricultural premiums as set out in § 43-21-106.

Acts 1957, ch. 261, § 4; 1963, ch. 135, § 3; T.C.A., § 43-2412; Acts 1980, ch. 670, § 6.